District of Columbia statutes.
16-2397

Interlocutory order of guardianship.

(a)

If it is in the child’s best interests, the court may enter an interlocutory guardianship order, which shall by its terms automatically become a guardianship order on a date therein named, not less than 6 months nor more than one year from the date of entry of the interlocutory order, unless in the interim the order shall have been set aside for cause shown.

(b)

The agency having responsibility for the child shall be permitted to visit the child during the period of the interlocutory order and may be ordered to provide services as specified in the interlocutory order.

(c)

The court may revoke its interlocutory guardianship order, either on its own motion or on the motion of one of the parties, for good cause shown, at any time before it becomes a guardianship order if it is in the child’s best interests. Before the revocation, personal notice shall be given to the parties and an adjudicatory hearing shall be conducted pursuant to section 16-2388.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 3(b), 48 DCR 1637
For temporary (225 day) addition of subchapter V, “Permanent Guardianship”, consisting of §§ 16-2381 to 16-2399, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Guardianship Subsidy Temporary Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-208, July 27, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 7547).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).